Illinois, session 104th, SB2200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 9-145, 10-166, 10-167, and 10-168 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-145)7    Sec. 9-145. Statutory level of assessment. Except in 8counties with more than 200,000 inhabitants which classify 9property for purposes of taxation, property shall be valued as 10follows: 11        (a) Each tract or lot of property shall be valued at 33 12    1/3% of its fair cash value. 13        (b) Each taxable leasehold estate shall be valued at 14    33 1/3% of its fair cash value. 15        (c) Each building or structure which is located on the 16    right of way of any canal, railroad or other company 17    leased or granted to another company or person for a term 18    of years, shall be valued at 33 1/3% of its fair cash 19    value. 20        (d) Any property on which there is a coal or other 21    mine, or stone or other quarry, shall be valued at 33 1/3% 22    of its fair cash value. Oil, gas and other minerals, 23    except coal, shall have value and be assessed separately   SB2200- 2 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1    at 33 1/3% of the fair cash value of such oil, gas and 2    other minerals. Coal shall be assessed separately at 33 3    1/3% of the coal reserve economic value, as provided in 4    Sections 10-170 through 10-200. 5        (e) In the assessment of property encumbered by public 6    easement, any depreciation occasioned by such easement 7    shall be deducted in the valuation of such property. Any 8    property dedicated as a nature preserve or as a nature 9    preserve buffer under the Illinois Natural Areas 10    Preservation Act, for the purposes of this paragraph, is 11    encumbered by a public easement and shall be depreciated 12    for assessment purposes to a level at which its valuation 13    shall be $1 per acre or portion thereof. For the purposes 14    of this paragraph, any property registered in perpetuity 15    under Section 16 of the Illinois Natural Areas 16    Preservation Act is encumbered by a public easement and 17    shall be depreciated for assessment purposes to a level at 18    which its valuation is $5 per acre, or portion thereof, 19    and any improvement, dwelling, or other appurtenant 20    structure present on that land shall be valued at 33 1/3% 21    of its fair cash value. 22    This Section is subject to and modified by Sections 10-110 23through 10-140 and 11-5 through 11-65.24(Source: P.A. 91-497, eff. 1-1-00.) 25    (35 ILCS 200/10-166)  SB2200- 3 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1    Sec. 10-166. Land Registered land or land encumbered by 2conservation rights; valuation. Except in counties with more 3than 200,000 inhabitants that classify property for the 4purpose of taxation, to the extent any portion of any lot, 5parcel, or tract of land is (i) registered in perpetuity under 6Section 16 of the Illinois Natural Areas Preservation Act, or 7(ii) encumbered in perpetuity by a conservation right, as 8defined in the Real Property Conservation Rights Act, if the 9conservation right has been conveyed and accepted in 10accordance with Section 2 of the Real Property Conservation 11Rights Act, recorded under Section 5 of that Act, and yields a 12public benefit as defined in Section 10-167 of this Act, upon 13application under Section 10-168, the portion of the lot, 14parcel, or tract of land registered or encumbered shall be 15valued at 3% 8-1/3% of its fair market value estimated as if it 16were not registered or encumbered; and any improvement, 17dwelling, or other appurtenant structure present on any 18registered or encumbered portion of land shall be valued at 1933-1/3% of its fair market value. Beginning with the 1995 tax 20year in counties with more than 200,000 inhabitants that 21classify property for the purpose of taxation, to the extent 22any portion of a lot, parcel, or tract of land is (i) 23registered in perpetuity under Section 16 of the Illinois 24Natural Areas Preservation Act or (ii) encumbered in 25perpetuity by a conservation right, as defined in the Real 26Property Conservation Rights Act, if the conservation right   SB2200- 4 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1has been conveyed and accepted in accordance with Section 2 of 2the Real Property Conservation Rights Act, recorded under 3Section 5 of that Act, and yields a public benefit as defined 4in Section 10-167 of this Code, upon application under Section 510-168, the portion of the lot, parcel, or tract of land 6registered or encumbered shall be valued at 25% of that 7percentage of its fair market value established under this 8Code, by an ordinance adopted under Section 4 of Article IX of 9the Illinois Constitution, or both, as the case may be; and any 10improvement, dwelling, or other appurtenant structure present 11on any registered or encumbered portion of the land shall be 12valued at that percentage of fair market value established 13under this Code, by an ordinance adopted under Section 4 of 14Article IX of the Illinois Constitution, or both, as the case 15may be. To qualify for valuation under this Section, the 16registration agreement or conservation right establishing an 17encumbrance shall: (1) prohibit the construction of any other 18structure on the registered or encumbered land except 19replacement structures, no larger than the previous structures 20which are replaced, that do not interfere with or destroy the 21features of the land that are intended to be protected by the 22registration or conservation right; and (2) confine existing 23and future structures on the encumbered land to building 24envelopes.25    As used in this Section, "building envelope" means a 26clearly defined portion of the encumbered land in which   SB2200- 5 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1buildings and structures may exist, the location of which does 2not interfere with or destroy the features of the land that are 3intended to be protected by the conservation right. 4    The valuation provided for in this Section shall not apply 5to any land that has been valued as open space land under 6Section 10-155.7(Source: P.A. 88-657, eff. 1-1-95.) 8    (35 ILCS 200/10-167)9    Sec. 10-167. Definition of public benefit; certification. 10    (a) A conservation right on land shall be considered to 11provide a demonstrated public benefit if the Department of 12Natural Resources certifies that it protects in perpetuity at 13least one of the following: 14        (1) Land providing a regular opportunity for public 15    access to outdoor recreation or outdoor education. 16        (2) Land preserving habitat for plant and animal 17    species that are native to Illinois State or federal 18    endangered or threatened species or federal candidate 19    species as defined in the Code of Federal Regulations (50 20    CFR 424.02). 21        (3) Land identified in the Illinois Natural Areas 22    Inventory. 23        (4) Land determined to be eligible for registration 24    under Section 16 of the Illinois Natural Areas 25    Preservation Act.   SB2200- 6 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1        (5) Land contributing to the ecological viability of a 2    park, conservation area, nature preserve, or other high 3    quality native terrestrial or aquatic area that is 4    publicly owned or otherwise protected. 5        (6) Land included in, or consistent with a federal, 6    State, regional, or local government policy or plan for 7    the conservation of wildlife habitat or open space, for 8    the restoration or protection of lakes and streams, or for 9    the protection of scenic areas.10        (7) Land located adjacent to a park, conservation 11    area, nature preserve, or other land or water area that is 12    publicly owned or otherwise permanently protected for 13    conservation purposes, if the conservation right on that 14    land furthers the conservation purposes of the adjacent 15    protected area. 16    (b) The person liable for taxes on the land shall submit an 17application to the Department of Natural Resources requesting 18certification that the land meets one of the criteria 19established in subsection (a). The application shall be in a 20form furnished by the Department of Natural Resources. Within 2130 days of receipt of a complete and correct application for 22certification, the Department of Natural Resources shall 23determine whether the land encumbered by a conservation right 24provides a demonstrated public benefit and shall inform the 25applicant in writing of the decision.26(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.)   SB2200- 7 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1    (35 ILCS 200/10-168)2    Sec. 10-168. Valuation of registered land or land 3encumbered by conservation rights; application process.4    (a) The person liable for taxes on land eligible for 5assessment under Section 10-166 must file a verified 6application requesting the registered land or conservation 7rights valuation with the chief county assessment officer by 8January 31 of the first year that the valuation is desired. If 9the application is not filed by January 31, the taxpayer 10waives the right to claim that valuation for that year. The 11application shall be in the form prescribed by the Department 12and shall contain information as may reasonably be required to 13determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of 14Section 10-166. If the application shows the applicant is 15entitled to the valuation, the chief county assessment officer 16shall approve it and maintain that valuation until notified as 17provided in Section 10-169. Otherwise, the application shall 18be rejected. The application shall be accompanied by the 19certification provided for in Section 10-167, if required.20    (b) When the application has been filed with and approved 21by the chief county assessment officer, he or she shall 22determine the valuation of the land as otherwise permitted by 23law and as required under Section 10-166, and shall keep a 24record of that valuation.25(Source: P.A. 88-657, eff. 1-1-95.)   SB2200- 8 -LRB104 06203 HLH 16238 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.